California statutes. Penal Code
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the commission may also seek additional funding from the money allocated in this subdivision based on need if the environmental law enforcement training is mandated or if there are substantial changes in the law that require the commission to revise its environmental law courses.

(c) The secretary shall develop an application process for awarding funds to programs pursuant to
 subdivision (b).

(d) The agency shall not award grants to, or enter into a contract with, the California District Attorneys Association for funding pursuant to this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 83, Sec. 10.   (SB 157)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14315.

Not later than 36 months after the date when this title may be implemented, as specified in Section 14314, the secretary shall post on the agency’s Web site, updated no later than July 1, annually, a description of the operation and accomplishments of the training programs and the environmental enforcement and prosecution projects funded by this title. The commission shall prepare the section of the report pertaining to the course of instruction authorized in Section 14304 and submit it to the secretary for inclusion in the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 644, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 5. PEACE OFFICERS' MEMORIAL [15001. - 15003.]

15001.

(a) The construction of a memorial to California peace officers on the grounds of the State Capitol is hereby authorized. For purposes of this part, the grounds of the State Capitol are that property in the City of Sacramento bounded by Ninth, Fifteenth, “L,” and “N” Streets. The actual site for the memorial shall be selected by the commission after consultation with the Department of General Services and the State Office of Historic Preservation.

(b) Funds for the construction of the memorial shall be provided through private contributions for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1518, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15003.

Peace officer memorial ceremonies, including the dedication of the memorial and any subsequent ceremonies, shall be conducted by the California Peace Officers’ Memorial Foundation, Inc.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 242.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 6. CONTROL OF DEADLY WEAPONS [16000. - 34400.]



TITLE 1. PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS [16000. - 17360.]



  DIVISION 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [16000. - 16025.]

16000.

This act recodifies the provisions of former Title 2 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 4, which was entitled “Control of Deadly Weapons.” The act shall be known and may be cited as the “Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

Nothing in the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010 is intended to substantively change the law relating to deadly weapons. The act is intended to be entirely nonsubstantive in effect. Every provision of this part, of Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, and every other provision of this act, including, without limitation, every cross-reference in every provision of the act, shall be interpreted consistent with the nonsubstantive intent of the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.

(a) A provision of this part or of Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, or any other provision of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, insofar as it is substantially the same as a previously existing provision relating to the same subject matter, shall be considered as a restatement and continuation thereof and not as a new enactment.

(b) A reference in a statute to a previously existing provision that is restated and continued in this part or in Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, or in any other provision of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, shall, unless a contrary intent appears, be deemed a reference to the restatement and continuation.

(c) A reference in a statute to a provision of this part or of Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, or any other provision of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, which is substantially the same as a previously existing provision, shall, unless a contrary intent appears, be deemed to include a reference to the previously existing provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16015.

If a previously existing provision is restated and continued in this part, or in Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, or in any other provision of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, a conviction under that previously existing provision shall, unless a contrary intent appears, be treated as a prior conviction under the restatement and continuation of that provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16020.

(a) A judicial decision interpreting a previously existing provision is relevant in interpreting any provision of this part, of Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, or any other provision of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, which restates and continues that previously existing provision.

(b) However, in enacting the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, the Legislature has not evaluated the correctness of any judicial decision interpreting a provision affected by the act.

(c) The Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010 is not intended to, and does not, reflect any assessment of any judicial decision
 interpreting any provision affected by the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16025.

(a) A judicial decision determining the constitutionality of a previously existing provision is relevant in determining the constitutionality of any provision of this part, of Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4, or any other provision of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, which restates and continues that previously existing provision.

(b) However, in enacting the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, the Legislature has not evaluated the constitutionality of any provision affected by the act, or the correctness of any judicial decision determining the constitutionality of any provision affected by the act.

(c) The Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010 is not intended to, and does not, reflect any determination of the constitutionality of any provision affected by the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 2. DEFINITIONS [16100. - 17360.]

16100.

Use of the term “.50 BMG cartridge” is governed by Section 30525.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16110.

Use of the term “.50 BMG rifle” is governed by Section 30530.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16120.

As used in this part, “abuse” means any of the following: 

(a) Intentionally or recklessly to cause or attempt to cause bodily injury. 

(b) Sexual assault. 

(c) To place a person in reasonable apprehension of imminent serious bodily injury to that person or to another.
 

(d) To molest, attack, strike, stalk, destroy personal property, or violate the terms of a domestic violence protective order issued pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16130.

As used in Section 26915, “agent” means an employee of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16140.

As used in this part, “air gauge knife” means a device that appears to be an air gauge but has concealed within it a pointed, metallic shaft that is designed to be a stabbing instrument which is exposed by mechanical action or gravity which locks into place when extended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16150.

(a) As used in this part, except in subdivision (a) of Section 30305 and in Section 30306, “ammunition” means one or more loaded cartridges consisting of a primed case, propellant, and with one or more projectiles. “Ammunition” does not include blanks.

(b) As used in subdivision (a) of Section 30305 and in Section 30306, “ammunition” includes, but is not limited to, any bullet, cartridge, magazine, clip, speed loader, autoloader, ammunition feeding device, or projectile capable of being fired from a firearm with a deadly consequence. “Ammunition” does not include blanks.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 3.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16151.

(a) As used in this part, commencing January 1, 2018, “ammunition vendor” means any person, firm, corporation, or other business enterprise that holds a current ammunition vendor license issued pursuant to Section 30385.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2018, a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, shall automatically be deemed a licensed ammunition vendor, provided the dealer complies with the requirements of Articles 2 (commencing with Section 30300) and 3 (commencing with Section 30342) of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of Title 4.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.2.)
-------------------------------------------

16160.

As used in this part, “antique cannon” means any cannon manufactured before January 1, 1899, which has been rendered incapable of firing or for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16170.

(a) As used in Sections 30515 and 30530, “antique firearm” means any firearm manufactured before January 1, 1899.

(b) As used in Section 16520, Section 16650, subdivision (a) of Section 23630, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 27505, and subdivision (a) of Section 31615, “antique firearm” has the same meaning as in Section 921(a)(16) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(c) As used in Sections 16531 and 17700, “antique firearm” means either of the following:

(1) Any firearm not designed or redesigned for using rimfire or conventional center fire
 ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before the year 1898. This type of firearm includes any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system or replica thereof, whether actually manufactured before or after the year 1898.

(2) Any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before the year 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.   (AB 879)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

16180.

As used in this part, “antique rifle” means a firearm conforming to the definition of an “antique firearm” in Section 479.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16190.

As used in this part, “application to purchase” means either of the following:

(a) The initial completion of the register by the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned a firearm, as required by Section 28210.

(b) The initial completion and transmission to the Department of Justice of the record of electronic or telephonic transfer by the dealer on the purchaser,
 transferee, or person being loaned a firearm, as required by Section 28215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 3.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16200.

Use of the term “assault weapon” is governed by Sections 30510 and 30515.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16220.

As used in this part, “ballistic knife” means a device that propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a coil spring, elastic material, or compressed gas. Ballistic knife does not include any device that propels an arrow or a bolt by means of any common bow, compound bow, crossbow, or underwater speargun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16230.

As used in this part, “ballistics identification system” includes, but is not limited to, any automated image analysis system that is capable of storing firearm ballistic markings and tracing those markings to the firearm that produced them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16240.

As used in this part, “basic firearms safety certificate” means a certificate issued before January 1, 2003, by the Department of Justice pursuant to former Article 8 (commencing with Section 12800) of Chapter 6 of Title 2 of Part 4, as that article read at any time from when it became operative on January 1, 1992, to when it was repealed on January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16250.

(a) As used in this part, “BB device” means any instrument that expels a projectile, such as a BB or a pellet, through the force of air pressure, gas pressure, or spring action, or any spot marker gun.

(b) This section shall be operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 915, Sec. 2.   (SB 199)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16260.

As used in this part, “belt buckle knife” is a knife that is made an integral part of a belt buckle and consists of a blade with a length of at least two and one-half inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16270.

As used in this part, “blowgun” means a hollow tube designed and intended to be used as a tube through which a dart is propelled by the force of the breath of the user.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16280.

As used in this part, “blowgun ammunition” means a dart designed and intended for use in a blowgun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16288.

As used in Section 31360, “body armor” means any bullet-resistant material intended to provide ballistic and trauma protection for the person wearing the body armor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16290.

As used in this part, “body vest” or “body shield” means any bullet-resistant material intended to provide ballistic and trauma protection for the wearer or holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16300.

As used in this part, “bona fide evidence of identity” or “bona fide evidence of majority and identity” means a document issued by a federal, state, county, or municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator’s license, state identification card, identification card issued to a member of the armed forces, or other form of identification that bears the name, date of birth, description, and picture of
 the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16310.

As used in this part, “boobytrap” means any concealed or camouflaged device designed to cause great bodily injury when triggered by an action of any unsuspecting person coming across the device. Boobytraps may include, but are not limited to, guns, ammunition, or explosive devices attached to trip wires or other triggering mechanisms, sharpened stakes, and lines or wire with hooks attached.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16320.

(a) As used in this part, “camouflaging firearm container” means a container that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) It is designed and intended to enclose a firearm. 

(2) It is designed and intended to allow the firing of the enclosed firearm by external controls while the firearm is in the container. 

(3) It is not readily recognizable as containing a firearm.

(b) “Camouflaging firearm container” does not include any camouflaging covering used while engaged in lawful hunting or while going to or returning from a lawful hunting expedition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16330.

As used in this part, “cane gun” means any firearm mounted or enclosed in a stick, staff, rod, crutch, or similar device, designed to be, or capable of being used as, an aid in walking, if the firearm may be fired while mounted or enclosed therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16340.

As used in this part, “cane sword” means a cane, swagger stick, stick, staff, rod, pole, umbrella, or similar device, having concealed within it a blade that may be used as a sword or stiletto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16350.

As used in Section 30515, “capacity to accept more than 10 rounds” means capable of accommodating more than 10 rounds. The term does not apply to a feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16360.

As used in this part, “CCW” means “carry concealed weapons.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16370.

As used in Sections 31610 to 31700, inclusive, “certified instructor” or “DOJ Certified Instructor” means a person designated as a handgun safety instructor by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31635.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16380.

As used in this part, “chamber load indicator” means a device that plainly indicates that a cartridge is in the firing chamber. A device satisfies this definition if it is readily visible, has incorporated or adjacent explanatory text or graphics, or both, and is designed and intended to indicate to a reasonably foreseeable adult user of the pistol, without requiring the user to refer to a user’s manual or any other resource other than the pistol itself, whether a
 cartridge is in the firing chamber.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16400.

As used in this part, “clear evidence of the person’s identity and age” means either of the following: 

(a) A valid California driver’s license. 

(b) A valid California identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16405.

As used in this part, “composite knuckles” means any device or instrument made wholly or partially of composite materials, other than a medically prescribed prosthetic, that is not metal knuckles, that is worn for purposes of offense or defense in or on the hand, and that either protects the wearer’s hand while striking a blow or increases the force of impact from the blow or injury to the individual receiving the blow.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16410.

As used in this part, “consultant-evaluator” means a consultant or evaluator who, in the course of that person’s profession is loaned firearms from a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, for research or evaluation, and has a current certificate of eligibility issued pursuant to Section 26710.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16420.

Use of the term “dagger” is governed by Section 16470.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16430.

As used in Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2, “deadly weapon” means any weapon, the possession or concealed carrying of which is prohibited by any provision listed in Section 16590.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16440.

Use of the term “dealer” is governed by Section 26700.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16450.

As used in Sections 31610 to 31700, inclusive, in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29030) of Division 7 of Title 4, and in Article 3 (commencing with Section 30345) of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of Title 4, “department” means the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16460.

(a) As used in Sections 16510, 16520, and 16780, and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, “destructive device” includes any of the following weapons:

(1) Any projectile containing any explosive or incendiary material or any other chemical substance, including, but not limited to, that which is commonly known as tracer or incendiary ammunition,
 except tracer ammunition manufactured for use in shotguns.

(2) Any bomb, grenade, explosive missile, or similar device or any launching device therefor.

(3) Any weapon of a caliber greater than 0.60 caliber which fires fixed ammunition, or any ammunition therefor, other than a shotgun (smooth or rifled bore) conforming to the definition of a “destructive device” found in subsection (b) of Section 479.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shotgun ammunition (single projectile or shot), antique rifle, or an antique cannon. 

(4) Any rocket, rocket-propelled projectile, or similar device of a diameter greater than 0.60 inch, or any launching device therefor, and any rocket, rocket-propelled projectile, or similar device containing any explosive or incendiary material or any other chemical substance, other
 than the propellant for that device, except those devices as are designed primarily for emergency or distress signaling purposes. 

(5) Any breakable container that contains a flammable liquid with a flashpoint of 150 degrees Fahrenheit or less and has a wick or similar device capable of being ignited, other than a device which is commercially manufactured primarily for the purpose of illumination. 

(6) Any sealed device containing dry ice (CO2) or other chemically reactive substances assembled for the purpose of causing an explosion by a chemical reaction. 

(b) A bullet containing or carrying an explosive agent is not a destructive device as that term is used in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16470.

As used in this part, “dirk” or “dagger” means a knife or other instrument with or without a handguard that is capable of ready use as a stabbing weapon that may inflict great bodily injury or death. A nonlocking folding knife, a folding knife that is not prohibited by Section 21510, or a pocketknife is capable of ready use as a stabbing weapon that may inflict great bodily injury or death only if the blade of the knife is exposed and locked into
 position.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16480.

Use of the term “DOJ Certified Instructor” is governed by Section 16370.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16490.

As used in this part, “domestic violence” means abuse perpetrated against any of the following persons: 

(a) A spouse or former spouse. 

(b) A cohabitant or former cohabitant, as defined in Section 6209 of the Family Code. 

(c) A person with whom the respondent is having
 or has had a dating or engagement relationship. 

(d) A person with whom the respondent has had a child, where the presumption applies that the male parent is the father of the child of the female parent under the Uniform Parentage Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12 of the Family Code). 

(e) A child of a party or a child who is the subject of an action under the Uniform Parentage Act, where the presumption applies that the male parent is the father of the child to be protected. 

(f) Any other person related by consanguinity or affinity within the second degree.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.

Use of the phrase “drop safety requirement for handguns” is governed by Section 31900.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16505.

For purposes of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26400) of Division 5 of Title 4, a firearm is “encased” when that firearm is enclosed in a case that is expressly made for the purpose of containing a firearm and that is completely zipped, snapped, buckled, tied, or otherwise fastened with no part of that firearm exposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 4.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16510.

As used in subdivision (a) of Section 16460 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, “explosive” means any substance, or combination of substances, the primary or common purpose of which is detonation or rapid combustion, and which is capable of a relatively instantaneous or rapid release of gas and heat, or any substance, the primary purpose of which, when combined with others, is to form a substance capable of a relatively
 instantaneous or rapid release of gas and heat. “Explosive” includes, but is not limited to, any explosive as defined in Section 841 of Title 18 of the United States Code and published pursuant to Section 555.23 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any of the following: 

(a) Dynamite, nitroglycerine, picric acid, lead azide, fulminate of mercury, black powder, smokeless powder, propellant explosives, detonating primers, blasting caps, or commercial boosters. 

(b) Substances determined to be division 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, or 1.6 explosives as classified by the United States Department of Transportation. 

(c) Nitro carbo nitrate substances (blasting agent) classified as division 1.5 explosives by the United States Department of Transportation. 

(d) Any material designated as an explosive by the State Fire Marshal. The designation shall be made pursuant to the classification standards established by the United States Department of Transportation. The State Fire Marshal shall adopt regulations in accordance with the Government Code to establish procedures for the classification and designation of explosive materials or explosive devices that are not under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to provisions of Section 841 of Title 18 of the United States Code and published pursuant to Section 555.23 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations that define explosives. 

(e) Certain division 1.4 explosives as designated by the United States Department of Transportation when listed in regulations adopted by the State Fire Marshal. 

(f) As used in Section 16460 and Chapter 1
 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, “explosive” does not include any destructive device, nor does it include ammunition or small arms primers manufactured for use in shotguns, rifles, and pistols.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16515.

“Federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms” means a person, firm, corporation, or other entity that holds any valid federal firearms license that authorizes the person, firm, corporation, or other entity to imprint serial numbers onto firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 3.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16517.

“Federally licensed manufacturer or importer” means a person, firm, corporation, or other entity that holds a valid license to manufacture or import firearms issued pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 4.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.

“Federally regulated firearm precursor part” means any firearm precursor part deemed to be a firearm pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto, and, if required, has been imprinted with a serial number by a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms in compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 5.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16520.

(a) As used in this part, “firearm” means a device, designed to be used as a weapon, from which is expelled through a barrel, a projectile by the force of an explosion or other form of combustion.

(b) As used in the following provisions, “firearm” includes the frame or receiver of the weapon, including both a completed frame or receiver, or a firearm precursor part:

(1) Section 136.2.

(2) Section 646.91.

(3) Sections 16515 and 16517.

(4) Section 16550.

(5) Section 16730.

(6) Section 16960.

(7) Section 16990.

(8) Section 17070.

(9) Section 17310.

(10) Sections 18100 to 18500, inclusive.

(11) Section 23690.

(12) Sections 23900 to 23925, inclusive.

(13) Commencing on July 1, 2026, Sections 25250 to 25275, inclusive.

(14) Sections 26500 to 26590, inclusive.

(15) Sections 26600 to 27140, inclusive.

(16) Sections 27200 to 28490, inclusive.

(17) Sections 29010 to 29150, inclusive.

(18) Section 29185.

(19) Sections 29610 to 29750, inclusive.

(20) Sections 29800 to 29905, inclusive.

(21) Sections 30150 to 30165, inclusive.

(22) Section 31615.

(23) Sections 31700 to
 31830, inclusive.

(24) Sections 34355 to 34370, inclusive.

(25) Sections 527.6 to 527.9, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(26) Sections 8100 to 8108, inclusive, of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(27) Section 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) As used in the following provisions, “firearm” also includes a rocket, rocket propelled projectile launcher, or similar device containing an explosive or incendiary material, whether or not the device is designed for emergency or distress signaling purposes:

(1) Section
 16750.

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 16840.

(3) Section 25400.

(4) Sections 25850 to 26025, inclusive.

(5) Subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 26030.

(6) Sections 26035 to 26055, inclusive.

(d) As used in the following provisions, “firearm” does not include an unloaded antique firearm:

(1) Section 16730.

(2) Section 16550.

(3) Section 16960.

(4) Section 17310.

(5) Subdivision (b) of Section 23920.

(6) Section 25135.

(7) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 of Title 4.

(8) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26400) of Division 5 of Title 4.

(9) Sections 26500 to 26588, inclusive.

(10) Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(11) Section 27510.

(12) Section 27530.

(13) Section 27540.

(14) Section 27545.

(15) Sections 27555 to 27585, inclusive.

(16) Sections 29010 to 29150, inclusive.

(17) Section 29180.

(e) As used in Sections 34005 and 34010, “firearm” does not include a destructive device.

(f) As used in Sections 17280 and 24680, “firearm” has the same meaning as in Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(g) As used in Sections 29180 to 29184, inclusive,
 “firearm” includes the completed frame or receiver of a weapon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (AB 725)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16525.

(a) As used in Section 33700, “firearm barrel” means the tube, usually metal and cylindrical, through which a projectile or shot charge is fired. A firearm barrel includes any forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled, or converted to be used as a firearm barrel, or that is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as a firearm barrel once completed, assembled, or converted. A firearm barrel may have a rifled or smooth bore.

(b) A firearm barrel that is attached or affixed to a firearm is not subject to the requirements of Section 33700.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16530.

(a) As used in this part, the terms “firearm capable of being concealed upon the person,” “pistol,” and “revolver” apply to and include any device designed to be used as a weapon, from which is expelled a projectile by the force of any explosion, or other form of combustion, and that has a barrel less than 16 inches in length. These terms also include any device that has a barrel 16 inches or more in length which is designed to be interchanged with a barrel less than 16 inches
 in length. 

(b) Nothing shall prevent a device defined as a “firearm capable of being concealed upon the person,” “pistol,” or “revolver” from also being found to be a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16531.

(a) “Firearm precursor part” means any forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled or converted to be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm, or that is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once completed, assembled or converted.

(b) The Department of Justice, consistent with this section, shall provide written guidance and pictorial diagrams demonstrating
 examples of firearm precursor parts.

(c) Firearm parts that can only be used on antique firearms, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16170, are not firearm precursor parts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 7.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)